Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF951.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2453YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 951 Section 1. E911 SYSTEM REPAIR AND REPLACEMENT ââ 1 APPROPRIATIONS. 2 1. There is appropriated from the 911 emergency 3 communications fund created in section 34A.7A to the department 4 of homeland security and emergency management for the fiscal 5 year beginning July 1, 2024, and ending June 30, 2025, the 6 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For grants to counties to repair or replace E911 systems 9 damaged or destroyed due to natural disasters in calendar year 10 2024 in counties with a population between 16,000 and 16,500 11 according to the 2020 federal decennial census: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 13 2. Moneys appropriated in this section shall be allocated 14 prior to distributions under section 34A.7A, subsection 2, 15 paragraphs âbâ through âfâ. 16 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 17 this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 18 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 19 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 20 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 21 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 22 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 23